Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 40.1-22.
Safety and Health Codes Commission continued as Safety and Health Codes Board.

The Safety and Health Codes Commission is continued and shall hereafter be known as the Safety and Health Codes Board. The Board shall consist of fourteen members, twelve of whom shall be appointed by the Governor. One member shall, by reason of previous vocation, employment or affiliation, be chosen to represent labor in the manufacturing industry; one member shall, by reason of previous vocation, employment or affiliation, be chosen to represent labor in the construction industry; one member shall, by reason of previous vocation, employment or affiliation, be chosen to represent industrial employers; one member shall be chosen from and be a representative of the general public; one member shall be a representative of agricultural employers; one member shall, by reason of previous vocation, employment or affiliation, be chosen to represent agricultural employees; one member shall, by reason of previous vocation, employment or affiliation, be chosen to represent construction industry employers; one member shall be a representative of an insurance company; one member shall be a labor representative from the boiler pressure vessel industry; one member shall be a labor representative knowledgeable in chemicals and toxic substances; one member shall be an employer representative of the boiler pressure vessel industry; one member shall be an industrial representative knowledgeable in chemical and toxic substances, and the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or his duly authorized representative shall be a member ex officio with full membership status. The Commissioner of Health or his duly authorized representative shall also be a member ex officio with full membership status.

The first appointive members shall be appointed as follows: one for a term of four years, one for a term of three years, one for a term of two years, and one for a term of one year. Of the members appointed to represent the construction industry, one shall be appointed for the term of two years and one shall be appointed for the term of four years. Succeeding appointments shall be for terms of four years each but other vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

The Board shall annually select a chairman from its members. The Board shall meet at least once every six months; other meetings may be held upon call of the chairman or any three members of the Board. Five members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.

The Board shall study and investigate all phases of safety in business establishments, the application of this title thereto, and shall serve as advisor to the Commissioner.

The Board, with the advice of the Commissioner, is hereby authorized to adopt, alter, amend, or repeal rules and regulations to further, protect and promote the safety and health of employees in places of employment over which it has jurisdiction and to effect compliance with the Federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (P.L. 91-596), and as may be necessary to carry out its functions established under this title. The Commissioner shall enforce such rules and regulations. All such rules and regulations shall be designed to protect and promote the safety and health of such employees. In making such rules and regulations to protect the occupational safety and health of employees, the Board shall adopt the standard which most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis of the best available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairment of health or functional capacity. However, such standards shall be at least as stringent as the standards promulgated by the Federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (P.L. 91-596). In addition to the attainment of the highest degree of health and safety protection for the employee, other considerations shall be the latest available scientific data in the field, the feasibility of the standards, and experience gained under this and other health and safety laws. Whenever practicable, the standard promulgated shall be expressed in terms of objective criteria and of the performance desired. Such standards when applicable to products which are distributed in interstate commerce shall be the same as federal standards unless deviations are required by compelling local conditions and do not unduly burden interstate commerce.

Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall apply to the adoption of rules and regulations under this section and to proceedings before the Board.

(6a)

The Board shall provide, without regard to the requirements of Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2, for an emergency temporary standard to take immediate effect upon publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the City of Richmond, Virginia, if it determines that employees are exposed to grave danger from exposure to substances or agents determined to be toxic or physically harmful or from new hazards, and that such emergency standard is necessary to protect employees from such danger. The publication mentioned herein shall constitute notice that the Board intends to adopt such standard within a period of six months. The Board by similar publication shall prior to the expiration of six months give notice of the time and date of, and conduct a hearing on, the adoption of a permanent standard. The emergency temporary standard shall expire within six months or when superseded by a permanent standard, whichever occurs first, or when repealed by the Board.

Any person who may be adversely affected by a standard issued under this title may challenge the validity of such standard in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond by declaratory judgment. The determination of the Safety and Health Codes Board shall be conclusive if supported by substantial evidence in the record considered as a whole. Adoption of a federal occupational safety and health standard shall be deemed to be sufficient evidence to support promulgation of such standard. The filing of a petition for declaratory judgment shall not operate as a stay of the standard unless the court issues a preliminary injunction.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-20; 1962, c. 66; 1968, c. 272; 1970, cc. 321, 649; 1972, c. 567; 1973, c. 425; 1974, c. 195; 1976, c. 607; 1979, c. 656; 1980, c. 728; 1984, c. 590; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 165; 1988, c. 467.

Cross references.

As to compensation and expenses of boards, commissions and similar bodies, see §

2.2-2813

. As to regulations related to migrant labor camps, see §

32.1-211

.

Law Review.

For article, “Enforcement of Occupational Safety and Health Laws in Virginia: A New Beginning,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 535 (1978).

For note on employee drug testing, see 74 Va. L. Rev. 969 (1988).

For article, “State Criminal Prosecutions: Putting Teeth in the Occupational Safety and Health Act,” see 12 G.M.U. L. Rev. 737 (1990).

For a note, “Are You Breaking Some Sort of Law?:
Protecting an Employee’s Informal Complaints Under the Fair Labor Standards Act’s Anti-Retaliation Provision,” see 42 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 319 (2000).

§ 40.1-22.1.
Governor authorized to enter certain agreements.

The Governor of Virginia is hereby authorized to enter into:

Such agreements with the United States Occupational Safety and Health Administration as are necessary to provide training for the employees of the Virginia Department of Labor and Industry and other appropriate agencies of the Commonwealth to assist in the enforcement of Public Law 91-596.

Reciprocal agreements with the appropriate authorities of any state within the United States and of the District of Columbia, with respect to the collection of claims for wages and other demands upon claims filed with the Department of Labor and Industry.

History.

1976, c. 607; 1997, c. 282.

Law Review.

For article, “Enforcement of Occupational Safety and Health Laws in Virginia: A New Beginning,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 535 (1978).

§§ 40.1-23 through 40.1-25.1.
Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 340, effective January 1, 1989.

§ 40.1-26.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 631.

§ 40.1-27.
Preventing employment by others of former employee.

No person doing business in this Commonwealth, or any agent or attorney of such person after having discharged any employee from the service of such person or after any employee shall have voluntarily left the service of such person shall willfully and maliciously prevent or attempt to prevent by word or writing, directly or indirectly, such discharged employee or such employee who has voluntarily left from obtaining employment with any other person. For violation of this section the offender shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not less than $100 nor more than $500. But this section shall not be construed as prohibiting any person from giving on application for any other person a truthful statement of the reason for such discharge, or a truthful statement concerning the character, industry and ability of such person who has voluntarily left.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-22; 1970, c. 321.

Law Review.

For note, “Erosion of the Employment-at-Will Doctrine: Recognition of an Employee’s Right to Job Security,” see 43 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 593 (1986).

For comment, “Potential Employer Liability for Employee References,” see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 427 (1987).

For article, “The Law of Wrongful Discharge in Virginia,” see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 133 (1988).

§ 40.1-27.1.
Discharge of employee for absence due to work-related injury prohibited.

It shall be an unfair employment practice for an employer who has established an employment policy of discharging employees who are absent from work for a specified number of days to include in the computation of an employee’s work absence record any day that such employee is absent from work due to a compensable absence under Title 65.2; provided, that such compensable absences can be calculated into an employee’s work record for purposes of discharge after all steps of the excessive absenteeism policy have been exhausted.
An employer shall not be held in violation of this section if the employee’s absence exceeds six months or if the employer’s circumstances have changed during such employee’s absence so as to make it impossible or unreasonable not to discharge such employee.

History.

1989, c. 572.

Law Review.

For survey on employment law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 607 (1989).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Master and Servant, § 11; 21 M.J. Workers’ Compensation, § 38.

§ 40.1-27.2.
Preference for veterans and spouses.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Disabled veteran” means a veteran who has been found by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or by the retirement board of one of the several branches of the armed forces to have a compensable service-connected permanent and total disability.“Veteran” has the same meaning ascribed to such term in §

2.2-2903

.

An employer may grant preference in hiring and promotion to a veteran or the spouse of a disabled veteran.

Granting preference under subsection B does not violate any local or state equal employment opportunity law.

History.

2014, c. 740.

§ 40.1-27.3.
Retaliatory action against employee prohibited.

An employer shall not discharge, discipline, threaten, discriminate against, or penalize an employee, or take other retaliatory action regarding an employee’s compensation, terms, conditions, location, or privileges of employment, because the employee:

Or a person acting on behalf of the employee in good faith reports a violation of any federal or state law or regulation to a supervisor or to any governmental body or law-enforcement official;

Is requested by a governmental body or law-enforcement official to participate in an investigation, hearing, or inquiry;

Refuses to engage in a criminal act that would subject the employee to criminal liability;

Refuses an employer’s order to perform an action that violates any federal or state law or regulation and the employee informs the employer that the order is being refused for that reason; or

Provides information to or testifies before any governmental body or law-enforcement official conducting an investigation, hearing, or inquiry into any alleged violation by the employer of federal or state law or regulation.

This section does not:

Authorize an employee to make a disclosure of data otherwise protected by law or any legal privilege;

Permit an employee to make statements or disclosures knowing that they are false or that they are in reckless disregard of the truth; or

Permit disclosures that would violate federal or state law or diminish or impair the rights of any person to the continued protection of confidentiality of communications provided by common law.

A person who alleges a violation of this section may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction within one year of the employer’s prohibited retaliatory action. The court may order as a remedy to the employee (i) an injunction to restrain continued violation of this section, (ii) the reinstatement of the employee to the same position held before the retaliatory action or to an equivalent position, and (iii) compensation for lost wages, benefits, and other remuneration, together with interest thereon, as well as reasonable attorney fees and costs.

History.

2020, c. 1136.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Whistle blower status. —

Former employee had sufficiently alleged that she was whistle blower where she had reported the alleged child abuse incidents to the city attorney, the court could fairly infer that the city attorney had an agency relationship with the governmental body and his knowledge was imputed to that body, and the former employee had alleged that she had reported to her supervisor.
Alexander v. City of Chesapeake, 108 Va. Cir. 161, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 130 (Chesapeake May 20, 2021).

Terminated employee alleged sufficient facts to support a claim because the employee, who was a bartender in employers’ club, alleged that the employee reported that a member’s behavior put the employee and other bartenders in an impossible situation, that the employee would refuse to serve the member if the member was intoxicated, and that the employee was terminated due to the employee’s stance on the issue. Foster v. Fraternal Order of Eagles, 108 Va. Cir. 409, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 200 (Rockingham County Aug. 19, 2021).

Remedy. —

While
Va. Code § 40.1-27.3(c) specifies a remedy, there is nothing to indicate it provides the exclusive remedy.
Chenault v. RBI Corp., 108 Va. Cir. 529, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 217 (Hanover County Oct. 22, 2021).

§ 40.1-27.4.
Discipline for employee’s medicinal use of cannabis oil prohibited.

As used in this section, “cannabis oil” means the same as that term is defined in §

54.1-3408.3

.

No employer shall discharge, discipline, or discriminate against an employee for such employee’s lawful use of cannabis oil pursuant to a valid written certification issued by a practitioner for the treatment or to eliminate the symptoms of the employee’s diagnosed condition or disease pursuant to §

54.1-3408.3

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, nothing in this section shall (i) restrict an employer’s ability to take any adverse employment action for any work impairment caused by the use of cannabis oil or to prohibit possession during work hours, (ii) require an employer to commit any act that would cause the employer to be in violation of federal law or that would result in the loss of a federal contract or federal funding, or (iii) require any defense industrial base sector employer or prospective employer, as defined by the U.S. Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency, to hire or retain any applicant or employee who tests positive for tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) in excess of 50 ng/ml for a urine test or 10 pg/mg for a hair test.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 395.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40.1-28.
Unlawful to require payment for medical examination as condition of employment.

It shall be unlawful for any employer to require any employee or applicant for employment to pay the cost of a medical examination or the cost of furnishing any medical records required by the employer as a condition of employment.

Any employer who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $100 for each violation. The Commissioner shall notify any employer who he alleges has violated any provision of this section by certified mail or overnight delivery service. Such notice shall contain a description of the alleged violation. Within 21 days of receipt of notice of the alleged violation, the employer may request an informal conference regarding such violation with the Commissioner. If the employer fails to contest the violation by requesting such an informal conference within 21 days following its receipt of the notice of the alleged violation, the violation and proposed penalty will become a final order of the Commissioner and not subject to review by any court or agency except upon a showing of good cause. Such informal conference shall result in a decision by the Commissioner that will be appealable to the appropriate circuit court. The Department shall send a copy of the Commissioner’s decision to the employer by certified mail or overnight delivery service. The employer may file a notice of an appeal only within 30 days from the receipt of the decision. The appeal shall be on the agency record. With respect to matters of law, the burden shall be on the party seeking review to designate and demonstrate an error of law subject to review by the court. With respect to issues of fact, the duty of the court shall be limited to ascertaining whether there was substantial evidence in the record to reasonably support the Commissioner’s findings of fact.

Civil penalties owed under this section shall be paid to the Commissioner for deposit into the general fund of the Treasury of the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall prescribe procedures for the payment of proposed penalties which are not contested by employers.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-22.1; 1952, c. 525; 1962, c. 66; 1970, c. 321; 1973, c. 425; 1982, c. 84; 2015, c. 285.

Cross references.

For provisions as to enforcement of this title and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and penalties for violations, see §

40.1-49.4

.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 285, in the second paragraph, deleted the former second sentence, which read “A penalty determination by the Commissioner shall be final, unless within fifteen days after receipt of such notice the person charged with the violation notifies the Commissioner by certified mail that he intends to contest the proposed penalty before the appropriate general district court” and added the remaining sentences.

§ 40.1-28.01.
Nondisclosure or confidentiality agreement; provisions regarding sexual assault; condition of employment.

No employer shall require an employee or a prospective employee to execute or renew any provision in a nondisclosure or confidentiality agreement that has the purpose or effect of concealing the details relating to a claim of sexual assault pursuant to §

18.2-61

,

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-67.3

, or

18.2-67.4

as a condition of employment. Any such provision is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

This section shall in no way limit other grounds that exist at law or in equity for the unenforceability of any such agreement or any provision of such agreement.

History.

2019, c. 131.

§§ 40.1-28.1 through 40.1-28.4:1.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 823, effective July 1, 2005.

§ 40.1-28.5.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 608.

§ 40.1-28.6.
Equal pay irrespective of sex.

No employer having employees shall discriminate, within any establishment in which such employees are employed, between employees on the basis of sex by paying wages to employees in such establishment at a rate less than the rate at which he pays wages to employees of the opposite sex in such establishment for equal work on jobs the performance of which requires equal skill, effort, and responsibility, and which are performed under similar working conditions, except where such payment is made pursuant to (i) a seniority system; (ii) a merit system; (iii) a system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production; or (iv) a differential based on any other factor other than sex.

For purposes of administration and enforcement, any amounts owing to any employee which have been withheld in violation of this section shall be deemed to be unpaid wages or unpaid overtime compensation and the employee whose wages have been wrongfully withheld in violation of this section shall have a right of action therefor to recover damages to the extent of two times the amount of wages so withheld.

This section shall not apply to employers covered by the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 as amended. Every action under this section shall be brought within two years next after the right to bring the same shall have accrued; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to give rise to a cause of action for work performed prior to July 1, 1974.

History.

1974, c. 405.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1974 act having been

40.1-28.1

.

Editor’s note.

For the Fair Labor Standards Act, referred to above, see 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.

Acts 2020, c. 901, cl. 1 provides: “That the Division of Human Rights of the Department of Law (the Division) is directed to develop recommendations regarding the type of information about businesses and their employees and the accompanying methodology that would be required for the Division to proactively enforce the provisions of §

40.1-28.6

of the Code of Virginia requiring equal pay of similarly situated employees irrespective of sex. Additionally, the Division shall develop recommendations regarding the data and methodological requirements for proactively enforcing a requirement for equal pay irrespective of race. The Division shall also develop recommendations regarding appropriate enforcement mechanisms, including causes of action and civil remedies, to address discrimination in compensation based on sex and race. In developing such recommendations, the Division shall engage stakeholders representing employers and employees in the Commonwealth. The Division shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly no later than November 30, 2020.”

Law Review.

For article, “The Status of the At-Will Employment Doctrine in Virginia after Bowman v. State Bank of Keysville,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 267 (1986).

For article, “The Law of Wrongful Discharge in Virginia,” see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 133 (1988).

For article, “Employment Law,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2019).

§ 40.1-28.7.
Repealed by Acts 1985, c. 421.

Cross references.

For present provisions as to remedies for the violation of rights of disabled persons, see §

51.5-46

.

§ 40.1-28.7:1.
Genetic testing or genetic characteristics as a condition of employment.

No employer shall:

Request, require, solicit or administer a genetic test, as defined in §

38.2-508.4

, to any person as a condition of employment; or

Refuse to hire, fail to promote, discharge or otherwise adversely affect any terms or conditions of employment of any employee or prospective employee solely on the basis of a genetic characteristic, as defined in §

38.2-508.4

, or the results of a genetic test, regardless of how the employer obtained such information or results. Nothing in this section shall preclude the use of information related to a criminal investigation.

The employee may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction over the employer who took adverse action against the employee in violation of this section. Any such action shall be brought within 180 days from the date of the adverse action. The court may, in its discretion, award actual or punitive damages, including back pay with interest at the judgment rate as provided in §

6.2-302

, or injunctive relief.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Department of Labor and Industry to conduct any investigations or enforcement actions.

As used in subdivision A 2 of this section, “terms and conditions of employment” shall not include any long term care, life or disability insurance policy.

History.

2002, cc. 565, 659.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-302

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-330.54” in subsection B to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in labor and employment law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2002).

§ 40.1-28.7:2.
Employers to allow crime victims leave to attend criminal proceedings.

As used in this section:“Criminal proceedings” means a proceeding at which the victim has the right or opportunity to appear involving a crime against the victim, including:

The initial appearance of the person suspected of committing the criminal offense against the victim;

Any proceeding in which the court considers the post-arrest release of the person accused of committing a criminal offense against the victim or the conditions of that release;

Any proceeding in which a negotiated plea for the person accused of committing the criminal offense against the victim will be presented to the court;

Any sentencing proceeding;

Any proceeding in which postconviction release from confinement is considered;

Any probation revocation disposition proceeding or any proceeding in which the court is requested to terminate the probation of a person who is convicted of committing a criminal offense against the victim; or

Any proceeding in which the court is requested to modify the terms of probation or intensive probation of a person if the modification will substantially affect the person’s contact with or safety of the victim or if the modification involves restitution or incarceration status.“Undue hardship” means a significant difficulty and expense to a business and includes the consideration of the size of the employer’s business and the employer’s critical need of the employee.“Victim” has the same meaning ascribed to the term in §

19.2-11.01

.

Every employer shall allow an employee who is a victim of a crime to leave work to be present at all criminal proceedings relating to a crime against the employee, as long as the employee has provided the employer with a copy of the form provided to the employee by the law-enforcement agency pursuant to subsection A of §

19.2-11.01

and, if applicable, provided the employer a copy of the notice of each scheduled criminal proceeding that is provided to the employee as victim. However, an employer may limit the leave provided under this section if the employee’s leave creates an undue hardship to the employer’s business.

An employer shall not dismiss an employee who is a victim of a crime because the employee exercises the right to leave work pursuant to subsection B.

An employer is not required to compensate an employee who is a victim of a crime when the employee leaves work pursuant to subsection B.

An employer shall not refuse to hire or employ, to bar or to discharge from employment, or to discriminate against, an individual in compensation or other terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because the individual leaves work to attend a criminal proceeding pursuant to this section.

History.

2007, c. 423.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 489 (2007).

§ 40.1-28.7:3.
Earned income tax credit; employer notice to employee.

Every employer shall post in the same location where other employee notices required by state or federal law are posted any notice provided by the Virginia Department of Social Services that informs employees that they may be eligible for federal and state earned income tax credits and may apply for the credit on their tax returns or receive the credit in advance payments during the year.

History.

2009, c. 698.

§ 40.1-28.7:4.
Release of employee’s personal identifying information.

As used in this section, “personal identifying information” means any of the following items of information about a current or former employee: home telephone number, mobile telephone number, email address, shift times, or work schedule.

An employer shall not, unless an exemption described in subsection C applies, be required to release, communicate, or distribute to a third party any current or former employee’s personal identifying information.

The provisions of subsection B shall not apply to a release, communication, or distribution of personal identifying information that is:

Required pursuant to any applicable provision of federal law that preempts the provisions of this section or of state law that requires an employer to release, communicate, or distribute personal identifying information;

Ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Required pursuant to a warrant issued by a judicial officer; or

Required by a subpoena issued in a pending civil or criminal case, or by discovery in a civil case.

History.

2013, c. 495.

§ 40.1-28.7:5.
Social media accounts of current and prospective employees.

As used in this section:“Employer” includes, in addition to the persons enumerated in the definition of employer in §

40.1-2

, (i) any unit of state or local government and (ii) any agent, representative, or designee of a person or unit of government that constitutes an employer.“Social media account” means a personal account with an electronic medium or service where users may create, share, or view user-generated content, including, without limitation, videos, photographs, blogs, podcasts, messages, emails, or website profiles or locations. “Social media account” does not include an account (i) opened by an employee at the request of an employer; (ii) provided to an employee by an employer such as the employer’s email account or other software program owned or operated exclusively by an employer; (iii) set up by an employee on behalf of an employer; or (iv) set up by an employee to impersonate an employer through the use of the employer’s name, logos, or trademarks.

An employer shall not require a current or prospective employee to:

Disclose the username and password to the current or prospective employee’s social media account; or

Add an employee, supervisor, or administrator to the list of contacts associated with the current or prospective employee’s social media account.

If an employer inadvertently receives an employee’s username and password to, or other login information associated with, the employee’s social media account through the use of an electronic device provided to the employee by the employer or a program that monitors an employer’s network, the employer shall not be liable for having the information but shall not use the information to gain access to an employee’s social media account.

An employer shall not:

Take action against or threaten to discharge, discipline, or otherwise penalize a current employee for exercising his rights under this section; or

Fail or refuse to hire a prospective employee for exercising his rights under this section.

This section does not prohibit an employer from viewing information about a current or prospective employee that is publicly available.

Nothing in this section:

Prevents an employer from complying with the requirements of federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations or the rules or regulations of self-regulatory organizations; or

Affects an employer’s existing rights or obligations to request an employee to disclose his username and password for the purpose of accessing a social media account if the employee’s social media account activity is reasonably believed to be relevant to a formal investigation or related proceeding by the employer of allegations of an employee’s violation of federal, state, or local laws or regulations or of the employer’s written policies. If an employer exercises its rights under this subdivision, the employee’s username and password shall only be used for the purpose of the formal investigation or a related proceeding.

History.

2015, c. 576.

§ 40.1-28.7:6.
Employers to allow leave for volunteer members of Civil Air Patrol; civil remedy.

Any employee who is a volunteer member of the Civil Air Patrol shall be entitled to leaves of absence from his employment without loss of seniority, accrued leave, benefits, or efficiency rating on all days during which such employee is (i) engaged in training for emergency missions with the Civil Air Patrol, not to exceed 10 workdays per federal fiscal year, or (ii) responding to an emergency mission as a Civil Air Patrol volunteer, not to exceed 30 workdays per federal fiscal year.

Any employee requesting leave pursuant to this section shall provide (i) certification that the employee has been authorized by the United States Air Force, the Governor, or a department, division, agency, or political subdivision of the state to respond to or train for an emergency mission and (ii) verification from the Civil Air Patrol of the emergency need of the employee’s volunteer service.

An employer may treat leaves of absence pursuant to this section as unpaid leave. No employer shall require an employee to exhaust any other leave to which the employee is entitled prior to such leaves of absence. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent an employer from providing paid leave during such leaves of absence.

Any employee aggrieved by a violation of any provision of this section may bring a civil action to enforce such provision. Any employee who is successful in such action shall be entitled to recover only lost wages, reasonable attorney fees, and court costs incurred in such action.

History.

2018, c. 277.

§ 40.1-28.7:7.
Misclassification of workers.

An individual who has not been properly classified as an employee may bring a civil action for damages against his employer for failing to properly classify the employee if the employer had knowledge of the individual’s misclassification. An individual’s representative may bring the action on behalf of the individual. If the court finds that the employer has not properly classified the individual as an employee, the court may award the individual damages in the amount of any wages, salary, employment benefits, including expenses incurred by the employee that would otherwise have been covered by insurance, or other compensation lost to the individual, a reasonable attorney fee, and the costs incurred by the individual in bringing the action.

In a proceeding under subsection A, an individual who performs services for a person for remuneration shall be presumed to be an employee of the person that paid such remuneration, and the person that paid such remuneration shall be presumed to be the employer of the individual who was paid for performing the services, unless it is shown that the individual is an independent contractor as determined under the Internal Revenue Service guidelines.

As used in this section, “Internal Revenue Service guidelines” means the most recent version of the guidelines published by the Internal Revenue Service for evaluating independent contractor status, including its interpretation of common law doctrine on independent contractors, and any regulations that the Internal Revenue Service may promulgate regarding determining whether an employee is an independent contractor, including 26 C.F.R. § 31.3121(d)-1.

In a proceeding under subsection A, a hiring party providing an individual with personal protective equipment in response to a disaster caused by a communicable disease of public health threat for which a state of emergency has been declared pursuant to §

44-146.17

shall not be considered in any determination regarding whether such individual is an employee or independent contractor. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms “communicable disease of public health threat,” “disaster,” and “state of emergency” have the same meaning as provided in § 44-146.16.

History.

2020, cc. 203, 381; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 448.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 448, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection D.